Arkansas, session 2025, SB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-116. Behavioral health programs.
(a) No later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Human Services,
as the Medicaid agency, in consultation with the Department of Education
shall establish regional behavioral health programs to assist public school
districts and open-enrollment public charter schools with locating the
appropriate services for a student who demonstrates a behavior that is
substantially likely to cause injury to the student, other students, or
staff.
*TNL309*
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
(b) A behavioral health program shall:
(1) Respond to a request from a public school district or an
open-enrollment public charter school within forty-eight (48) hours of
notification of the request; and
(2) Work with a referring public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school and the family of a student referred under
this section to develop a behavioral health management plan for a student who
demonstrates behavior that is substantially likely to cause injury to the
student, other students, or staff.
(c) A behavioral health management plan developed under subdivision
(c)(2) of this section shall include without limitation:
(1) The appropriate services for a student referred under this
section and his or her family; and
(2) A plan for transitioning a student referred under this
section back to his or her public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school when the student is no longer demonstrating a behavior that is
substantially likely to cause injury to the student, other students, or
staff.
(d) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Develop behavior health programs to adequately meet the
needs of Arkansas students; and
(2)(A) Collaborate with the Department of Education to identify
regional alternative learning environments to repurpose the locations to be
utilized for a behavior health program.
(B) If an alternative learning environment is not
available in a region, the Department of Human Services and Department of
Education shall identify a location within the region to be utilized for a
behavior health program.
(e) The Department of Human Services and the Department of Education
shall develop appropriate funding sources for students referred to a behavior
health program under this section and who do not have the ability to pay for
care.
(f) A behavior health program shall:
(1) Provide the necessary treatment for a student who
demonstrates a behavior that is substantially likely to cause injury to the
student, other students, or staff; and
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
(2) A program does not establish exclusionary policies for
admittance or removal that directly relate to the:
(A) Level of services needed by a student referred under
this section;
(B) Level of danger posed by a student referred under this
section;
(C) Level of intellectual functioning of a student
referred under this section; or
(D) Disability status of a student referred under this
section.
(g) The Department of Education shall provide funding for the
education of students in approved residential or inpatient facilities in
accordance with § 6-20-107.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-202(a)(2), concerning the definition
of "reside" as it pertains to age and residency requirements for attending
public schools, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Reside” means to be physically present and to maintain a
permanent place of abode for an average of no less than four (4) calendar
days and nights per week for a primary purpose other than school attendance.
(B) "Reside" does not include an out-of-state student
placed in a residential facility in Arkansas;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-20-104 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-104. Reimbursement for educational services provided in juvenile
detention facilities — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “juvenile detention facility” means
any facility operated by a political subdivision of the state for the
temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent, or adjudicated
delinquent, who require secure custody in a physically restricting facility.
(2) Under § 9-27-330(a)(11), such a juvenile detention facility
must shall provide educational and other rehabilitative services to
adjudicated delinquents who may be ordered by the court to remain in the
juvenile detention facility for an indeterminate period not to exceed ninety
(90) days.
(b)(1) Upon disposition by the juvenile court that an adjudicated
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
juvenile shall stay in a juvenile detention facility for any period of time,
the facility shall notify the juvenile's resident school district of his or
her whereabouts and within five (5) days after the juvenile is released shall
certify the detention dates to the district.
(2) The school district where the facility is located and the
juvenile detention facility shall jointly be responsible for providing
educational services to students placed in the juvenile detention facility
and shall complete an application for funding to be based on the approved
student capacity of the facility and shall submit the application to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(3) If the amount of state funds due cannot be agreed upon by
the juvenile detention facility and the school district where the facility is
located, an appeal shall be made to the division. All decisions rendered
shall be final.
(3)(A) A juvenile detention facility may partner with a public
school district, an open-enrollment public charter school, or a private
educational provider to provide educational services.
(B) An agreement for educational services under
subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be outlined in a memorandum of
understanding and included in the application for funding submitted under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(4) The division shall monitor educational services provided
under this section.
(c) The division shall issue rules for the effective implementation of
this section, including:
(1) The classification of Classifying juvenile detention centers
facilities as approved residential treatment facilities;
(2) The designation of the Designating juvenile detention
facility and the district where the juvenile detention facility is located
facilities as responsible for educating the student students consistent with
federal and state laws for any period of time the student is students are
being held in the juvenile detention facility; and
(3) The designation of Designating the resident district of a
student who is being held in a juvenile detention facility as responsible for
the timely transfer of a the student's educational records to the district
where the juvenile detention facility is located upon notification by the
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
court of the student's placement in a the juvenile detention facility.
(d) The funds appropriated to the division for juvenile detention
facilities shall be allocated in accordance with rules promulgated by the
State Board of Education.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-20-107 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-107. Educational cost reimbursement prohibition — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “juvenile” means a person who is eighteen
(18) years of age or younger.
(b)(1)(a)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, a
public school district, or an open-enrollment public charter school shall not
be liable for any educational costs or other related costs associated with
the placement of a juvenile in an out-of-state residential or inpatient
facility for any care and treatment, including psychiatric treatment, unless:
(A) At the time of placement, the juvenile's physician
determines that the out-of-state placement is medically necessary and is the
most appropriate placement available;
(B) The division authorizes public payment for educational
costs based on a determination that the educational program and facilities
are appropriate for the juvenile and the division has approved the facility's
educational program;
(C)(i) Each educational program authorization precedes the
placement.
(ii) If the educational program is not authorized
before placement, the division, public school districts, or open-enrollment
public charter schools shall not be responsible for educational or other
related costs, nor shall they the division be subject to any order to pay for
educational or other related costs; and
(D) The out-of-state residential or inpatient facility is
located within a state that borders Arkansas.
(2) Payment under this subsection shall be:
(A) Limited to twenty (20) students at any one (1) time
during a calendar year unless:
(i) The juvenile under subdivision (b)(1) (a)(1) of
this section qualifies as disabled a child with a disability under the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.; and
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
(ii) Payment is required under the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.; and
(B) Subject to the availability of division funding.
(c)(b) The division, a public school district, or an open-enrollment
public charter school shall not be liable for any educational costs or other
related costs associated with the placement of a juvenile in an in-state
residential or inpatient facility for any care and treatment, including
psychiatric treatment, unless:
(1) The division authorizes public payment for educational costs
based on a determination that the educational program and facilities are
appropriate for the juvenile and the division has approved the facility's
educational program; and
(2)(A) Each educational program authorization precedes the
placement.
(B) If the educational program is not authorized before
the placement, the division, public school districts, or open-enrollment
public charter schools shall not be responsible for education or other
related costs, nor shall they the division be subject to any order to pay for
educational or other related costs.
(d)(c) The liability of the division, a public school district, or an
open-enrollment public charter school for the educational costs or other
related costs described in subsections (a) and (b) and (c) of this section
shall be limited to the lesser of:
(1) The reimbursement rate established by the division for a
juvenile placed in a residential or inpatient facility; or
(2) The normal and customary educational cost reimbursement rate
of the state in which a juvenile is placed in an out-of-state residential or
inpatient facility as determined by the division.
(e)(d) This section shall not apply to a juvenile placed in an
Arkansas juvenile detention facility as defined in § 6-20-104.
(f)(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require payment
by the division, a public school district, or an open-enrollment public
charter school for educational costs and other related costs associated with
the placement of a juvenile in an out-of-state residential or inpatient
facility for any care or treatment, including psychiatric treatment, before
April 7, 2005.
04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB451
(g)(f) The funds appropriated to the division for residential or
inpatient facilities shall be:
(1) Be allocated in accordance with rules promulgated by the
State Board of Education; and
(2) Not be used for the provision of education or other related
costs for out-of-state students placed in Arkansas residential facilities.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Safe Schools Initiative
Act requires public schools to establish behavioral threat assessment teams
to address public school safety and security; that behavioral threat
assessment teams established by public schools shall follow best practices
for team composition and process; that student mental health poses an ongoing
crisis and can pose immediate threats in public schools; that public schools
are consistently identifying certain students as imminent threats, but day
treatment and mental health placements and services are unavailable for
students who need these placements and services; and that this act is
immediately necessary to ensure that the Department of Human Services and the
Department of Education establish regional behavioral health programs in
order to address immediate public school safety and security needs.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Hester





04-03-2025 15:13:22 TNL309